Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WALLIN EDUCATION PARTNERS.new text end new text begin $750,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Wallin Education Partners to support its career development program, which provides career exploration, skill building, mentoring, direct talent pipeline development, and early employment readiness for under-resourced participants. Money may also be used to expand Wallin's construction and health care pathways programs, which offer advising, hands-on learning, and work-based experience to prepare participants for careers in construction, health care, and related fields. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end